District of Columbia statutes.
42-2207

Mayor’s report to Council.

The Mayor shall submit to the Council, not later than 6 months after the end of each fiscal year, a report on the financial condition of the fund and the results of the operation of the fund for the fiscal year.

Mar. 24, 1988, D.C. Law 7-96, § 8, 35 DCR 891
1981 Ed., § 45-3007.